en: Robusta ground coffees
fr: Café Robusta moulu
hr: Robusta mljevene kave
hu: Őrölt Robusta kávék
nl: Gemalen Robusta koffies

en: Robusta coffee beans
fr: Grains de café robusta
hr: Robusta kava u zrnu
hu: Szemes Robusta kávék, Robusta szemes kávék
nl: Gemalen Robustica koffiebonen
pt: Grãos de café robusta

en: Instant coffees, Soluble coffees, Coffee powders, Instant coffee powder
bg: Разтворимо кафе
ca: Cafès solubles, Cafès instantanis, Cafès en pols
cs: Instantní káva
de: lösliche Kaffees, Pulverkaffees, Instantkaffees
es: Cafés solubles
fi: pikakahvit
fr: Cafés solubles, cafés en poudre, café en poudre, cafés instantanés, café soluble, café instantané, cafés instantanés en poudre, café instantané en poudre, Café en poudre soluble
hr: Instant kave
hu: Instant kávék, Oldódó kávé, Kávéporok
it: Caffè istantaneo
ja: インスタントコーヒー
lt: Tirpios kavos, tirpi kava, kavos milteliai, tirpios kavos milteliai
nl: Oploskoffies, Oploskoffie
pl: Kawa rozpuszczalna, Kawa instant, Kawy rozpuszczalne, Kawy instant
pt: Cafés instantâneos
ru: Растворимый кофе, кофе растворимый
tr: Kahve tozu, Suda çözünür kahve tozu, Hazır kahve tozu
zh: 速溶咖啡, 即时咖啡

en: Coffee without sugar
bg: Кафе без захар
fr: Café non sucré
hr: Kava bez šećera
hu: Cukormentes kávé
pl: Kawa bez cukru
pt: Café sem açúcar

en: Espresso coffee without sugar
de: Espresso ohne Zucker
es: Café expreso sin azúcar
fr: Café expresso non sucré
hr: Espresso kava bez šećera
hu: Cukormentes espresso kávé, espresso kávé cukor nélkül
it: Caffè espresso senza zucchero
nl: Espresso koffie zonder suiker
pt: Café expresso sem açúcar

en: Cappuccino, Coffee drinks with milk
fr: Boissons lactées au café
hr: Cappuccino
hu: Cappuccino
it: Caffè-latte, Latte al caffè
lt: Kavos gėrimas su pienu
nl: Cappuccino, Koffiedranken met melk
ro: Lapte pentru cafea

en: Coffee with milk with sugar
de: Kaffee mit Milch und Zucker
es: Café con leche con azúcar
fr: Café au lait sucré
hr: Kava s mlijekom sa šećerom
hu: Kávé tejjel és cukorral
it: Caffè con latte con zucchero
nl: Koffie met melk met suiker
pt: Café com leite com açúcar
ru: Кофе с молоком и сахаром
zh: 加糖牛奶咖啡

en: Coffee with milk without sugar
fr: Café au lait non sucré

en: Instant coffee with milk without sugar
es: Café con leche instantáneo sin azúcar
fr: Café au lait instantané non sucré
hr: Instant kava s mlijekom bez šećera
hu: Instant kávé tejjel és cukor nékül
it: Caffè al latte istantaneo senza zucchero
nl: Instant koffie met melk zonder suiker
pt: Café com leite instantâneo sem açúcar

en: Latte, White coffee without sugar
es: Café blanco sin azúcar
fr: Café crème non sucré
hr: Kavu s mlijekom
hu: Latte, Café latte
it: Caffè bianco senza zucchero
nl: Latte, Koffie verkeerd, Witte koffie zonder suiker
pt: Café branco sem açúcar

en: Latte macchiato
xx: Latte macchiato
ar: لاتيه ماكياتو
bg: Лате макиато
de: Milchmischgetränk, Latte macchiato
fa: لاته ماکیاتو
hu: Latte macchiato
ja: ラッテ・マキアート
kk: Латте макиато
ko: 라테 마키아토
mk: Лате макијато
ru: Латте макиато
sr: Лате макијато
th: ลัตเตมักกีอาโต
uk: Лате-мак'ято
zh: 拿铁玛琪雅朵

en: Instant white coffee without sugar
es: Café blanco instantáneo sin azúcar
fr: Café crème instantané non sucré
hr: Instant bijela kava bez šećera
hu: Instant kávé cukor nékül
it: Caffè bianco istantaneo senza zucchero

en: Cappuccino without sugar
de: Zuckerfreier Cappuccino
es: Cappuccino sin azúcar
fr: Cappuccino non sucré
hr: Cappuccino bez šećera
hu: Cappuccino cukor nélkül
it: Cappuccino senza zucchero
nl: Cappuccino zonder suiker
pt: Cappuccino sem açúcar

en: Instant cappuccino without sugar
es: Cappuccino instantáneo sin azúcar
fr: Cappuccino instantané non sucré
hr: Instant cappuccino bez šećera
hu: Instant cappuccino cukor nélkül
it: Cappuccino istantaneo senza zucchero

en: Decaffeinated instant coffees, Decaffeinated soluble coffees, Decaffeinated coffee powders, Instant decaffeinated coffee in powder
de: entkoffeinierte lösliche Kaffees, koffeinfreie lösliche Kaffees, entkoffeinierte Pulverkaffees, koffeinfreie Pulverkaffees, entkoffeinierte Instantkaffees
es: Cafés solubles descafeinados
fi: kofeiinittomat pikakahvit
fr: Cafés en poudre décaféinés, Cafés instantanés décaféinés, Cafés solubles décaféinés, Café décaféiné en poudre soluble
hr: Instant kave bez kofeina
hu: Koffeinmentes instant kávék
lt: Tirpi kava be kofeino, tirpios kavos be kofeino, kavos milteliai be kofeino
nl: Cafeïnevrije oploskoffies, Cafeïnevrije oploskoffie
ru: растворимый кофе без кофеина, декофеинизированный растворимый кофе

en: Instant decaffeinated coffee without sugar
de: Entkoffeinierter Instantkaffee ohne Zucker
es: Café descafeinado instantáneo sin azúcar
fr: Café décaféiné non sucré instantané
hr: Instant kava bez kofeina bez šećera
hu: Koffeinmentes instant kávé cukor nélkül
it: Caffè decaffeinato istantaneo senza zucchero
nl: Oploskoffie zonder suiker, cafeïnevrij
pt: Café instantâneo descafeinado sem açúcar
ru: Растворимый кофе без кофеина без сахара

en: Decaffeinated coffee without sugar
de: Entkoffeinierter Kaffee ohne Zucker
es: Café descafeinado sin azúcar
fr: Café décaféiné non sucré
hr: Kava bez kofeina bez šećera
hu: Koffeinmentes kávé cukor nélkül
it: Caffè decaffeinato senza zucchero

en: Instant coffee without sugar
de: Instantkaffee ohne Zucker
es: Café instantáneo sin azúcar
fr: Café instantané non sucré
hr: Instant kava bez šećera
hu: Instant kávé cukor nélkül
it: Caffè istantaneo senza zucchero

en: Instant powder for cappuccino with chocolate
de: Instantpulver für Schokoladen-Cappuccino
es: Cappuccino de chocolate en polvo instantáneo
fr: Cappuccino au chocolat en poudre soluble
hr: Instant prah za cappuccino s čokoladom
it: Cappuccino al cioccolato in polvere istantanea

en: Instant powder for coffee with milk
de: Instantpulver für Kaffee mit Milch
es: Café con leche en polvo instantáneo
fr: Café au lait en poudre soluble
hr: Instant prah za kavu s mlijekom
it: Caffè con latte in polvere istantaneo
nl: Oploskoffie met melkpoeder